Utah statutes.
76-10-509.7.   Parent or guardian knowing of minor's possession of dangerous
weapon.
Any parent or guardian of a minor who knows that the minor is in possession of
a dangerous weapon in violation of Section 76-10-509 or a firearm in violation
of Section 76-10-509.4 and fails to make reasonable efforts to remove the
firearm from the minor's possession is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
